Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2125.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE V-C.TENANT'S RIGHTS.Section 501-C. Evictions.(a) Refusal or termination.--A landlord may only terminate or refuse to renew the lease of a lessee, or may evict a lessee and rental home occupant, for one of the following reasons:(1) Nonpayment of rent.(2) A second or subsequent violation of the community 123456789101112131415161718 rules or lease occurring within a six-month period.(3) If there is a change in use of the community land or any part of community land.(4) Termination of the rental home property.(b) Eviction procedure.--The following shall apply for a rental home lessee eviction:(1) A lessee may not be evicted by a self-help measure.(2) Prior to the commencement of any eviction proceeding or the termination of or failure to renew the lease of a lessee, the landlord shall notify the rental home lessee in writing of the particular breach or violation of the lease by certified or registered mail.(3) In the case of nonpayment of rent, the notice under paragraph (2) shall state that an eviction proceeding may be commenced if the rental home lessee does not pay the overdue rent within 20 days from the date of service if the notice is given on or after April 1 and before September 1, and 30 days if given on or after September 1 and before April 1 or an additional nonpayment of rent occurring within six months of the giving of the notice may result in immediate eviction proceedings.(4) In the case of a breach of the lease or violation of the community rules, other than nonpayment of rent under paragraph (3), the notice shall describe the particular breach or violation. No eviction action may be commenced nor shall the landlord terminate or refuse to renew the lease of the rental home lessee unless the rental home lessee has been notified as required by this section. Upon a second or subsequent violation or breach occurring within six months, the landlord may commence eviction proceedings at any time 20260HB2125PN2747 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within 60 days of the last violation or breach.(c) Nonenforcement of rules.--A rental home lessee shall not be evicted nor shall the landlord terminate or refuse to renew the lease of a rental home lessee when there is proof that the rules the lessee is accused of violating are not enforced with respect to the other rental home lessees or nonresidents on the community premises.Section 502-C. Community rules and regulations.(a) Establishment.--A landlord may at any time establish fair and reasonable rules and regulations reasonably related to the health, safety and upkeep of the community, provided the rules and regulations are not arbitrary or capricious and are included in any written lease and delivered to existing lessees and posted in the public portion of the community office or other conspicuous and readily accessible place near the rental property.(b) Uniform application.--All rules or rental charges shall be uniformly applied to all rental home lessees or prospective rental home occupants of the same or similar category. The lessee shall be provided with a written copy of the rules and regulations prior to the owner's or operator's acceptance of any initial deposit, fee or rent. In addition, a copy of this article shall be posted in the public portion of the community office or other conspicuous and readily accessible place in the rental home, and a copy of the following notice shall be reproduced in capital typewritten letters or in ten-point boldface print and be given to each resident upon entering into the lease:IMPORTANT NOTICE REQUIRED BY LAWThe rules set forth below govern the terms of your lease or 20260HB2125PN2747 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occupancy agreement with this rental home. The law requires all of these rules to be fair and reasonable.As a lessee, you may continue to stay in this community as long as you pay your rent and other reasonable fees, service charges and assessments hereinafter set forth and abide by the rules of the community. Entrance and exit fees may not be charged.As a lessee, you may be evicted for any of the following reasons:(1) Nonpayment of rent.(2) A second or subsequent violation of the community rules or lease occurring within a six-month period.(3) If there is a change in use of the community land or parts thereof.(4) Termination of the rental home property.As a lessee, you shall only be evicted in accordance with the following procedure:(1) A lessee shall not be evicted by any self-help measure.(2) Prior to the commencement of any eviction proceeding, the landlord shall notify the lessee in writing of the particular breach or violation of the lease or community rules by certified or registered mail.(3) In the case of nonpayment of rent, the notice under paragraph (2) shall state that an eviction proceeding may be commenced if the rental home lessee does not pay the overdue rent within 20 days from the date of service if the notice is given on or after April 1 and before September 1, and 30 days if given on or after September 1 and before April 1 or an additional nonpayment of rent occurring within six months of 20260HB2125PN2747 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the giving of the notice may result in immediate eviction proceedings.(4) In the case of a breach of the lease or violation of the community rules, other than nonpayment of rent under paragraph (3), the notice shall describe the particular breach or violation. No eviction action shall be commenced unless the lessee has been notified as required by this section, and upon a second or subsequent violation or breach occurring within six months, the landlord may commence eviction proceedings at any time within 60 days of the last violation or breach.As a lessee, you may not be evicted when there is proof that the rules you as the lessee are accused of violating are not enforced with respect to the other rental home residents or nonresidents on the community premises.In addition, no eviction proceeding for nonpayment of rent may be commenced against you as the lessee until you have received notice by certified or registered mail of the nonpayment and have been given to pay the overdue rent 20 days from the date of service if the notice is given on or after April 1 and before September 1, and 30 days if given on or after September 1 and before April 1. However, only one notice of overdue rent is required to be sent to you as the lessee during any six-month period. If a second or additional violation occurs within six months from the date of the first notice then eviction proceedings may be immediately started against you.You are entitled to purchase goods or services from a seller of your choice and the community owner shall not restrict your right to do so.The Attorney General of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or 20260HB2125PN2747 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the District Attorney of the county in which the rental home is located shall enforce these provisions. As a lessee, you may also bring a private cause of action. If your rights are violated you may contact the Bureau of Consumer Protection or your local District Attorney.Section 503-C. Disclosure of fees.(a) Disclosure of utilities.--All rent, fees, service charges and assessments payable to the landlord and utility charges for water, sewer, trash, Internet, cable, electricity and fuel charges payable to the landlord and notice of any other utility charges for which the lessee may be responsible shall be fully disclosed in writing to a prospective rental home lessee prior to the rental home owner or operator's acceptance of an initial deposit, fee or rent and prior to execution of the rental home space lease. For current rental home residents, the rental home community owner or operator shall fully disclose all rent, fees, service charges and assessments payable to the community owner and utility charges for water, sewer, trash, cable, electricity and fuel charges payable to others in writing prior to the execution of a mandatory lease of at least one month in duration.(b) Signature.--The landlord may require that the prospective lessee or current lessee sign a receipt indicating receipt of a copy of the required disclosure and the rental home community rules and regulations so long as the documents are clearly identified in the receipt itself. The receipt shall indicate nothing more than that the documents identified in the receipt have been received by the lessee.(c) Disclosure.--Failure to disclose rent, fees, service charges and assessments shall render the rent, fees, service 20260HB2125PN2747 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 charges and assessments void and unenforceable in this Commonwealth. Increases in rent, fees, service charges and assessments payable to the landlord shall be unenforceable until 30 days after notice thereof has been posted in the public portion of the community office or other conspicuous and readily accessible place in the rental home and mailed to the rental home lessee. Rent may not be increased during the term of the lease.(d) Cover sheet.--The written disclosure shall contain a cover sheet with the following statement in 12-point, sans-serif type, except the term "five calendar days" in the final paragraph of the notice shall appear in 16-point, sans-serif, bold type:This document contains important information regarding your legal rights and your financial obligations in leasing or renewing or signing a new lease for a rental home. Make sure that you read the entire document and seek legal advice if you have any questions regarding the information stated in this document.The statements contained in this disclosure are only summary in nature. A prospective lessee should refer to all references, including all lease or rental agreement documents as well as any rules and regulations that have been established for the rental home community. Oral representations should not be relied on as correctly stating the representations of the rental home community owner or operator. Instead, you should refer to the lease or rental agreement and required disclosure documents for correct representations. You should also refer to the act of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1176, No.261), known as the 20260HB2125PN2747 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Manufactured Home Community Rights Act, to become familiar with your obligations and rights as a rental home resident.You have five calendar days from the date you received this documentation to cancel your agreement in writing to the rental home community owner or operator.(e) Disclosures.--All new leases, lease extensions and lease renewals, which are for more than a 60-day period, shall contain the following full disclosures:(1) The manner in which utility and other services, including sewage and waste disposal, cable television, water supply and storm drainage, will be provided, and the entity providing them. The services or user fees charged by the landlord for the services provided by the rental home owner shall also be disclosed.(2) An explanation of the manner in which the rental amount will be increased, including notification to the rental home lessee at least 60 days in advance of the increase.(3) Disclosure of any factors that may affect the rental amount, including the following factors:(i) Water rates.(ii) Sewer rates.(iii) Waste disposal rates.(iv) Maintenance costs, including costs of deferred maintenance.(v) Management costs.(vi) Property taxes.(vii) Major repairs or improvements.(viii) Any other fees, costs, assessments or service 20260HB2125PN2747 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 charges that the rental home lessee is required to pay or that the rental home owner or operator intends to charge during the terms of the lease or rental agreement.(4) Disclosure of the manner in which the pass-through charges will be assessed.(5) A report of the utility fees charged for the rental home paid to the landlord by a prior lessee during the previous 12 months.(6) Disclosure of all service charges currently charged for services offered which the rental home lessee may elect to incur and the manner in which the fees will be increased.(7) Any rental home community rules and regulations that have been established and an explanation of the manner in which the rules and regulations will be set, changed or promulgated.(8) The rent history of the rental home for the three full calendar years immediately preceding the prospective initial rental agreement date. The information under this paragraph shall be for basic rental fees only and shall not apply to other fees such as late charges and guest fees. Additionally, the calculation of rent history shall be posted in the public portion of the rental home community's rental office or other conspicuous and readily accessible place and in the same place as any rules and regulations that have been established for the rental home community are posted.(9) Citations or other documents from Federal, State or local governmental agencies which require the rental home community owner to take corrective action, including citations from the Department of Environmental Protection regarding water and sewage. The information shall also be 20260HB2125PN2747 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 posted within the community in the same place as the rules and regulations are displayed until the corrective action has been completed.Section 504-C. Other fees.In accordance with a lessee's right to invite to the lessee's dwelling unit social and business visitors as the lessee wishes, no fee may be charged for overnight visitors or guests occupying a lessee's rental home. If an overnight visitor or guest frequently remain overnight for residential purposes so as to increase the number of persons normally living in the unit, the owner or operator of a rental home may revise the rent due to conform to the rent paid by other lessees with a like number of members in their household.Section 505-C. Sale or lease of rental home.(a) Written notice of sale or lease.--In the event of the sale or lease of a rental home, a rental home owner shall provide written notice to the residents and tenants of the community and to the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency. The notice shall be sent within 30 days after any agreement of sale is signed. The notice shall be posted in the same conspicuous and readily accessible place in the rental home community where the rules and regulations are posted, provided under section 502-C.(b) New owner notice.--Within 30 days of transfer of title to the community, the new owner shall notify the residents and tenants of the name of the new owner and contact information for either the new owner or new operator of the community. The notice shall be mailed to each resident and tenant and shall be posted immediately in the same conspicuous and readily accessible place in the rental home community where the rules 20260HB2125PN2747 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and regulations are posted, provided under section 502-C.Section 506-C. Closure of rental home.(a) Requirements.--In the event of the closure of a rental home, in whole or in part, the rental home owner shall:(1) Provide written notice to the residents and tenants of the community, to the resident association if one exists, to the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency and to the municipality where the rental home is located within 60 days of deciding to close the rental home. The notice shall include the estimated date residents and tenants will be expected to vacate the community, which shall be no less than 180 days from the date of the notice, and the estimated date the community will be closed.(2) Notify any prospective resident in writing, prior to leasing a rental home, and any known prospective tenant, prior to leasing a rental home, of the scheduled closing date.(b) Consideration.--A rental home owner shall consider any offer to purchase the community made by a resident association representing at least 25% of the tenants or by a nonprofit corporation, including a community development corporation, housing authority or redevelopment authority acting at the request of the residents of at least 25% of the units and shall negotiate in good faith with the entity submitting the offer.(c) Penalty prohibited.--A tenant who rents a unit in a rental home shall have the right to terminate the lease without penalty upon receiving notice of the planned closing of the rental home.Section 507-C. Notice requirements in event of closure of rental home.20260HB2125PN2747 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Certification and recipient.--The notice given to the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency under section 505-C shall be sent by certified mail and shall be addressed to the legal department of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.(b) Publication and other requirements.--(1) Within 60 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin stating the agency is compiling a list of parties interested in receiving copies of any notice received by it under sections 505-C and 506-C and inviting the parties to provide contact information to receive notices of community sales or closures. The notice under this paragraph shall also be published on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website. Interested parties may indicate their region of the Commonwealth or that they operate Statewide.(2) The Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency shall send copies of notices received under this section to parties on the list that are Statewide or within the region the parties identify under paragraph (1). Notices shall be sent by regular mail or by email within 10 calendar days of the receipt of a notice.(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to create any liability for the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency or otherwise to affect the transfer of any real property in the event there is a failure to provide notice in accordance with this act.(c) Notice requirements.--A notice given under subsection (b)(2) shall be:20260HB2125PN2747 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Delivered to an adult resident of each rental home unit within the rental home or mailed by first class mail to the resident or tenant of each unit.(2) Posted in the same conspicuous and readily accessible place in the rental home community where the rules and regulations are posted under section 502-C.(d) Personal notice.--A notice given under subsection (b)(2) shall be given personally to the prospective resident or known prospective tenant.Section 508-C. Waiver of rights.The rights and duties of rental home owners and operators and the rental home lessees may not be waived by any provisions of a written or oral agreement. Any agreement attempting to limit rights under this section shall be void and unenforceable in this Commonwealth.Section 509-C. Damages.(a) Cause of action.--A rental home owner, operator or lessee aggrieved by a violation of their rights under this article may institute a private cause of action to recover damages, or for treble damages where provided in this article or restitution in an appropriate court of initial jurisdiction in this Commonwealth.(b) Disclosure.--If disclosure as required by section 503-C was not provided to the rental home prospective first-time lessee prior to execution of the rental agreement or prior to initial occupancy of a unit, the rental agreement shall be voidable by the lessee during the first year of occupancy until five calendar days after the receipt of the disclosure by the lessee.(c) Notice of void.--To void the rental agreement, the 20260HB2125PN2747 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prospective first-time lessee shall deliver written notice to the rental home owner or operator within five days after receipt of the disclosure and shall be entitled to a refund from the owner or operator of the rental home.(d) Collection of rent.--The rental home owner or operator may not collect rent from a prospective first-time lessee until the rental home owner or operator and the lessee have entered into the rental agreement.(e) Increased rent collection.--When the rental home owner or operator and a rental lessee execute a new, renewed or extended lease for a rental home unit, which increases rent or payables to the lessor, the rental home owner or operator may not collect increased rent from the rental home lessee until the rental home owner or operator and the rental home lessee have entered into the new, renewed or extended lease. After receiving 60 days' notice of the rental home owner's or operator's intent to offer a new lease, the rental home occupant shall have 30 days to either accept the new, renewed or extended rental agreement or to notify the rental home owner or operator of intent to vacate within 30 days. No increased rent or fee lease charges shall be effective against a lessee prior to the 61st day after receiving the owner or operator notice.Section 510-C. Restraining prohibited acts.If the Attorney General or a district attorney has reason to believe that any person is using or is about to use any method, act or practice declared by this article to be prohibited, and that proceedings would be in the public interest, the Attorney General or district attorney may bring an action in the name of the Commonwealth against the person to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction the use of the method, act or practice.20260HB2125PN2747 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 511-C. Enforcement.The Attorney General shall have the power and duty to enforce the provisions of this article, but in no event shall an individual be prohibited or otherwise restricted from initiating a private cause of action under any right or remedy conferred by this article.Section 512-C. Retaliatory evictions.An action by a rental home owner or operator to recover possession of real property from a rental home lessee or to change the lease within six months of a lessee's assertion of rights under this article or any other legal right shall raise a presumption that the action constitutes a retaliatory and unlawful eviction by the owner or operator and is in violation of this article. A presumption under this section may be rebutted by competent evidence presented in any appropriate court of initial jurisdiction in this Commonwealth.Section 513-C. Remedies.A violation of this act may be enforced as provided by sections 509-C, 510-C, 511-C and 512-C and shall also constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice within the meaning of section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, and shall be a violation of and shall be subject to the enforcement provisions and private rights of action contained in the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law. Residents shall have the right to seek injunctive relief to enforce compliance with this section and sections 505-C and 506-C.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2125PN2747 - 15 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829